District of Columbia statutes.
2-1391

Establishment of the Office on African Affairs.

There is established an Office on African Affairs (“Office”). The Office shall ensure that a full range of health, education, employment, and social services are available to the African communities in the District, monitor service delivery to those communities, and make recommendations to the Mayor to promote the welfare of those communities.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-111, § 2, 53 DCR 2532